DI-502

DIAGNOSTICS -

SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI3QM-01

DTC

B0132/61

Short in P/T Squib (RH) Circuit
(to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P/T squib (RH) circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner (RH).

It causes the seat belt pretensioner (RH) to activate when the seat belt pretensioner (RH) activation condi-
tions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0132/61 is recorded when ground short is detected in the P/T squib (RH) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Short circuit in P/T squib (RH) wire harness (to ground) « Seat belt pretensioner (RH)
B0132/61 *P/T squib (RH) malfunction * Airbag sensor assembly
* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction » Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-493.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

2 [ Check P/T squib (RH) circuit.

H05166
H02138

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

CHECK:
P/T Squib (RH) _ For the connector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between
g'rbag the seat belt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sensorassem-
] 0= [ Agggronrbly i))l)l/( measure the resistance between PR+ and body ground.

H06833

@

e )

Go to step 5.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
PREPARATION:
P/T Squib (RH) (@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Airbag (b) Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR- of the con-
" D % ]I’ Sensor nector (on the seat belt [ i
Assembly pretensioner side) between the
{} seat belt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sensor assem-
bly.
o () Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
PR- PR+ ACC __ON wait at least for 2 seconds.
j CHECK:
or (@  Turnignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.
(b) Clear DTC stored in memory.
Check Connector DTC B0132/61 (See step 5 on page DI-447)
(¢)  Turnignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.
(d)  Turnignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.
osier Te (€) Check DTC.
ASSLa2 oo (See page DI-447)

OK:
DTCBO 132/61 is notoutput.
HINT:
Codesotherthancode B0 132/61 may be outputatthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check P/T squib (RH).

PREPARATION:

P/T Squib (RH) Aitbag

) El m Sensor

Assembly

ACC ON

D

Check Connector DTC B0132/61

H05168
AB0118 AB0119
R13006 H01079 H06835

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the seat belt pretensioner (RH) connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)
(b)

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

(c) Turnignition switchto LOCK, and wait atleastfor 20 se-

OK:

HINT:

conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 132/61 is notoutput.

Codesotherthancode B0 132/61 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace seat belt pretensioner (RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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5 Check floor wire harness.

Floor Wire Harness

CU%%DD:D

P/T Squib (RH)<~ —

H05169
H02138

Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

H06836

PREPARATION:

OK

Disconnect the floor wire harness connector on the airbag sen-
sorassembly side.

CHECK:

For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
seat belt pretensioner and the floor wire harness, measure the
resistance between PR+ and body ground.

OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

e

pair orreplace floor wire harness.

6 | Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness.

Floor Wire Harness

0 g 0

P/T Squib (RH)

H05170
H02145

CHECK:

Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

H06837

OK

For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
airbag sensor assembly and the floor wire harness, measure
theresistance between PR+ and body ground.

OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NG>

Repair or replace harness or connector be-
tween airbag sensor assembly and floor wire

harness.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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